Maryland, session 2025, HB0865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
14–110.5.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the State Disaster Recovery Fund.
(3) “Local Disaster Declaration” means a formal request for State disaster
relief and recovery assistance made as a result of an emergency by the senior elected official
through the local organization for emergency management.
(f) (1) The Governor may include in the annual budget bill an appropriation
to the Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) MONEY TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND FROM THE
CATASTROPHIC EVENT ACCOUNT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–324 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(III) repayments of principal and interest from loans made from the
Fund;
[(iii)] (IV) reimbursements from the federal government or other
legal entities for disaster recovery assistance expenditures made from the Fund;
[(iv)] (V) interest earnings of the Fund; and

HOUSE BILL 865 3
[(v)] (VI) any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–324.
(a) (1) In this section[,] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “Account” means the Catastrophic Event Account.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE STATE DISASTER RECOVERY FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–110.5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(b) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Account is established to enable
the State or a local government to respond without undue delay to a natural disaster or
other catastrophic situation, or federal employee financial hardship from a full or partial
federal government shutdown due to a lapse in federal appropriations that cannot be taken
care of within the resources of existing appropriations.
(c) The Governor may provide an appropriation in the budget bill to the Account.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, after a [15–day] 5–DAY
10–DAY review and comment period by the Legislative Policy Committee, the Governor
may transfer funds by budget amendment from the Account to:
(I) the expenditure accounts of the appropriate unit of State
government or unit of local government; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE
STATE DISASTER RECOVERY FUND.
(2) If the federal government is in a full or partial shutdown due to a lapse
in appropriations, after a 2–day review and comment period by the Legislative Policy
Committee, the Governor may transfer funds by budget amendment from the Account to
the Federal Government Shutdown Employee Assistance Loan Fund established under §
7–327 of this subtitle.
(e) Funds appropriated to the Catastrophic Event Account:
(1) may not be used to offset operating deficiencies in regular programs of
State government; but
(2) (I) may be expended to assist a unit of State government or unit of
local government in funding costs in connection with a natural disaster, a catastrophic

HOUSE BILL 865
situation, or a full or partial federal government shutdown due to a lapse in appropriations;
AND
(II) MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE DISASTER
RECOVERY FUND IF:
1. THE BALANCE OF THE FUND HAS BEEN DEPLETED
DUE TO USE OR TRANSFER; OR
2. THE ESTIMATED COSTS FOR PROVIDING ADEQUATE
DISASTER RELIEF FOR A NATURAL DISASTER OR CATASTROPHIC SITUATION ARE IN
EXCESS OF THE FUND’S BALANCE.
(f) (1) The Account is a continuing, nonlapsing fund which is not subject to §
7–302 of this subtitle.
(2) The Treasurer shall separately hold, and the Comptroller shall account
for, the Account.
(3) The Account shall be invested and reinvested in the same manner as
other State funds.
(4) Any investment earnings shall be subject to § 7–311(d) of this subtitle.
(g) Money appropriated to the Account does not revert to the Revenue
Stabilization Account.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.